Utah statutes.
20A-9-804.   Registration with county clerk.

(1)  Registration to vote in the Western States Presidential Primary election shall be conducted as provided in Title 20A, Chapter 2, Voter Registration.

(2)  The county clerk shall record the names of person registering to vote during that period in the official register and direct the election judges to allow those persons to vote in the Western States Presidential Primary election if they present themselves at the voting precinct on election day.

